Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.34
Tax included in sale price; authorized.

For purposes of the sales or use tax, if a retailer establishes to the satisfaction of the Tax Commissioner, and has been given prior approval by the Tax Commissioner, that the sales or use tax has been added to the total amount of the sale price and has not been absorbed by him or her, the total amount of the sale price shall be deemed to be the amount received exclusive of the tax imposed.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 58.